Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.331

Inspection reports.

If any inspection made under this chapter requires any correction or change in the work inspected, a written report of the inspection shall be made by the inspector, in which report the corrections or changes required shall be plainly stated. A copy of the report shall be furnished to the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity doing the installation work, and a copy shall be filed with the department.

[ 1983 c 206 s 8; 1935 c 169 s 9; RRS s 8307-9. Formerly RCW 19.28.250.]